Nebraska, session 109, LB498.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB498 LB498
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1006, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1006 (1) The For school fiscal year 2023-24 and each school
fiscal year thereafter, the department shall determine the foundation aid
to be paid to each school district in accordance with subsection (2) of
this section.
(2)(a) For school fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, the (2) The
foundation aid to be paid to each school district in each school fiscal
year shall equal (i) one thousand five hundred dollars multiplied by (ii)
the number of formula students for such school district.
(b) For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the foundation aid to be paid to each school district in each
school fiscal year shall equal (i) the amount of foundation aid paid per
formula student in the immediately preceding school fiscal year,
increased by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers published by the Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for
the previous calendar year, multiplied by (ii) the number of formula
students for such school district.
(3) Twenty-four percent of the total amount of foundation aid paid
each school fiscal year shall be paid from money appropriated from the
Education Future Fund.
(4) For school fiscal years 2023-24 and 2024-25, one hundred percent
of foundation aid shall be included as a formula resource pursuant to
section 79-1017.01. For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal
year thereafter, sixty percent of foundation aid shall be included as a
formula resource pursuant to section 79-1017.01.
Sec. 2. Section 79-1022, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine the amounts to
be distributed to each local system for the ensuing school fiscal year
-2-

LB498 LB498
2025 2025
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and
shall certify the amounts to the Director of Administrative Services, the
Auditor of Public Accounts, and each local system. On or before June 15,
2025 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the
department shall report the necessary funding level for the ensuing
school fiscal year to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and the Education Committee of the Legislature. The report
submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted
electronically. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
certified state aid amounts, including adjustments pursuant to section
79-1065.02, shall be shown as budgeted non-property-tax receipts and
deducted prior to calculating the property tax request in the local
system's general fund budget statement as provided to the Auditor of
Public Accounts pursuant to section 79-1024.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, subsection (8) of section
79-1016, and sections 79-1005, 79-1033, and 79-1065.02, the amounts
certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed
in ten as nearly as possible equal payments on the last business day of
each month beginning in September of each ensuing school fiscal year and
ending in June of the following year, except that when a local system is
to receive a monthly payment of less than one thousand dollars, such
payment shall be one lump-sum payment on the last business day of
December during the ensuing school fiscal year.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1022.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022, certification of
budget authority pursuant to section 79-1023, and certification of
applicable allowable reserve percentages pursuant to section 79-1027
completed prior to the effective date of this act June 1, 2023, for
school fiscal year 2025-26 2023-24 are null and void.
-3-

LB498 LB498
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Section 79-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1023 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify to
each school district budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for the ensuing school fiscal year.
(2) Except as provided in sections 79-1028.01, 79-1029, 79-1030, and
81-829.51, each school district shall have budget authority for the
general fund budget of expenditures equal to the greater of (a) the
general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school
fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section
79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by
the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which
budget authority is being calculated, (b) the general fund budget of
expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus
exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such
school fiscal year with the difference increased by an amount equal to
any student growth adjustment calculated for the school fiscal year for
which budget authority is being calculated, or (c) one hundred ten
percent of formula need for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated minus the special education budget of
expenditures as filed on the school district budget statement on or
before September 30 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year,
which special education budget of expenditures is increased by the basic
allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated.
(3) For any school fiscal year for which the budget authority for
the general fund budget of expenditures for a school district is based on
a student growth adjustment, the budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures for such school district shall be adjusted in
future years to reflect any student growth adjustment corrections related
-4-

LB498 LB498
2025 2025
to such student growth adjustment.
Sec. 5. Section 79-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1027 No district shall adopt a budget, which includes total
requirements of depreciation funds, necessary employee benefit fund cash
reserves, and necessary general fund cash reserves, exceeding the
applicable allowable reserve percentages of total general fund budget of
expenditures as specified in the schedule set forth in this section.
Average daily Allowable
membership of reserve
district percentage
0 - 471 45
471.01 - 3,044 35
3,044.01 - 10,000 25
10,000.01 and over 20
On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March 1 each year
thereafter, the department shall determine and certify each district's
applicable allowable reserve percentage for the ensuing school fiscal
year.
Each district with combined necessary general fund cash reserves,
total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit
fund cash reserves less than the applicable allowable reserve percentage
specified in this section may, notwithstanding the district's applicable
allowable growth rate, increase its necessary general fund cash reserves
such that the total necessary general fund cash reserves, total
requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund
cash reserves do not exceed such applicable allowable reserve percentage.
Sec. 6. Section 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1031.01 The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall
annually include the amount necessary to fund the state aid that will be
-5-

LB498 LB498
2025 2025
certified to school districts on or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or
before March 1 of each year thereafter for each ensuing school fiscal
year in its recommendations to the Legislature to carry out the
requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
Sec. 7. Original sections 79-1006, 79-1022, 79-1022.02, 79-1023,
79-1027, and 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are
repealed.
Sec. 8. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-6-